Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB634.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2710.1. Hate crimes against law enforcement officers and first responders.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of a hate crime against a law enforcement officer or a first responder if, with malicious intent because of the actual or perceived employment as a law enforcement officer or first responder, the person commits an offense under any of the following with respect to the individual, the individual's property, one or more members of the group or the group's property:(1) Any other provision of this article.123456789101112131415161718 (2) Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction), except for section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism).(3) Section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass).(b) Grading.--An offense under this section shall be classified as a misdemeanor of the third degree if the other offense is classified as a summary offense. If the other offense is not classified as a summary offense, an offense under this section shall be classified one degree higher in the classification specified under section 106 (relating to classes of offenses) than the classification of the other offense.(c) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for courts to consider in cases involving hate crimes against law enforcement officers or first responders.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"First responder." A firefighter or emergency medical services personnel."Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" is given under section 501 (relating to definitions)."Malicious intent." The intent to commit an act, the commission of which is a necessary element of an offense referred to under subsection (a), motivated by hatred toward the actual or perceived employment as a law enforcement officer or first responder.20250SB0634PN0639 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0634PN0639 - 3 - 1